Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.270

Limitation of type or weight of vehicles authorized—Penalty.

The board of county commissioners of each county may by resolution limit or prohibit classes or types of vehicles on any county road or bridge and may limit the weight of vehicles which may travel thereon. Any such resolution shall be effective for a definite period of time which shall be stated in the resolution. If such resolution is published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and if signs indicating such closure or limitation of traffic have been posted on such road or bridge, any person violating such resolution shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.75.270. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-8g.]

NOTES:

Local restrictions or limitations of weight: RCW 46.44.080.